South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S811.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.A.  Article 5, Chapter 25, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-25-425. (A) For purposes of this section, "extracurricular duties" include bus duty, recess duty, lunch duty, and those duties performed by a teacher outside the regular school day that involve students and are not directly related to the instructional program, such as coaching duties, taking tickets at sporting events, and acting as a faculty sponsor for a student club. Extracurricular duties do not include such things as time spent in parent-teacher conferences or activities related to courses taught by the teacher, such as band concerts that are performed as a part of band class. (B) With respect to duties and compensation, a teacher's contract shall specify: (1) salary, based on the district salary schedule, which: (a) may only be considered compensation for instruction, planning, and attending faculty meetings and professional development; and (b) may not be considered compensation for performing extracurricular duties; and (2) any extracurricular duties that the teacher agrees to perform, the amount of time the teacher agrees to provide each such duty, and additional compensation to be provided for each such duty. (C) A teacher may not be required to perform extracurricular duties, regardless of compensation, as an express or implied condition for employment. (D) Each school district shall develop and implement a plan ensuring the proper performance of extracurricular duties in schools either by securing the assistance of volunteers, employing additional nonprofessional staff, or providing extra compensation and other incentives to professional staff who contract to provide extracurricular duties. In developing and implementing this plan, a district should solicit input and support from school improvement councils, parent-teacher organizations, and other interested groups. Each district shall develop its initial plan for implementation before the beginning of the 2026-2027 School Year, and update it before July first annually thereafter. B. The provisions of this section are applicable to teacher contracts beginning with the 2026-2027 School Year. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----